Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1239.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 603 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 603. Ordinance Provisions.--* * *(m) (1) The governing body shall approve an application for 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 a development if the applicant establishes that:(i) the applicant has received a will-serve letter for the development from both a municipal water system and a municipal sewer system; and(ii) the development is located in a nonresidential zone or is otherwise designated for office, retail or parking.(2) A multifamily development, mixed-use development or adaptive reuse development approved under paragraph (1) is not subject to any of the following:(i) Required minimum or maximum residential density.(ii) Limits on the building height of a development that includes restricted-affordable dwelling units or restricted-deeply-affordable dwelling units that would prevent the addition of additional dwelling units above what would otherwise be feasible for each restricted-affordable dwelling unit, or each restricted-deeply-affordable dwelling unit, in the development.(iii) Mandatory setbacks greater than the least of standard utility easements, 10 feet or the existing setbacks of a building being converted to residential or mixed-use development through adaptive reuse.(iv) Restrictions on lot size or coverage.(v) Mandatory walls, fences or screening or use of impervious pavement outdoors other than if necessary for disability accommodation or public health and safety based on a preponderance of evidence.(vi) Mandatory nonpublic open space or common areas.(vii) One off-street residential parking space for each unit and accessible parking space requirements under 20260SB1239PN1548 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327).(viii) An equivalent number of parking spaces required under subparagraph (vii) provided through a shared parking agreement.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preempt definitions or uses as defined in the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the "Pennsylvania Construction Code Act."(4) As used in this subsection:"Adaptive reuse" shall mean a development that retains at least two exterior walls of an existing building."Development" shall mean a land development."Dwelling unit" shall mean a single unit providing complete independent living facilities for one or more individuals, including permanent facilities for cooking, eating, living, sanitation and sleeping."Nonresidential zone" shall mean a parcel or lot not zoned for residential development, including office, commercial or mixed-use development. The term does not include a parcel or lot zoned for agricultural or natural conservation use."Mixed-use development" shall mean a development consisting of residential and nonresidential uses in which the nonresidential uses are less than 50% of the total square footage of the development and are limited to the first floor of buildings that are at least two stories."Multifamily development" shall mean a building designed for at least five dwelling units in which the dwelling units share a common separation like a ceiling or wall and in which 20260SB1239PN1548 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access cannot be gained between units through an internal doorway, excluding common hallways."Restricted-affordable dwelling unit" shall mean a dwelling unit that either through a deed restriction or a development agreement with the municipality is rented or sold to households earning up to 120% of area median income."Restricted-deeply-affordable dwelling unit" shall mean a dwelling unit that either through a deed restriction or a development agreement with the municipality is rented or sold to households earning up to 60% of area median income.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1239PN1548 - 4 - 1234567891011